Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-152
Fees of state boards and agencies; withdrawal.

The Director of Administrative Services is authorized and empowered to draw his or her warrants against the several fee fund accounts of each of the special boards, bureaus, commissions, or divisions enumerated in section 33-151, upon duly itemized and verified vouchers approved by the person or persons having supervision or charge of the respective funds and who are authorized by law to approve such vouchers. Upon presentation of the warrants the State Treasurer shall countersign the same and shall pay the warrants out of, but never in excess of, the amount of the fee funds specifically appropriated.

Laws 1941, c. 68, § 3, p. 295;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-164;

R.S.1943, § 33-152;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 3.